tools/spellcheckers/test/desktopspeller-gt-norm-yamls/basespellertests_speller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../../tools/spellcheckers/generator-speller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/analyser-speller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../../tools/spellcheckers/generator-speller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/analyser-speller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Normativity tests: # We should not generate non-standard or irrelevant forms:
    ærrodit+Area/NO+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+ConNeg+Sg2: "ærrod>u"
    ærrodit+Area/SE+V+TV+Gram/3syll+ImprtII+ConNeg+Sg2: "ärrod>u"
    gievádit+V+IV+Gram/3syll+Ind+Prs+Sg3:               "gievát>"
    loapptet+V+TV+Pot+Sg1:                              "låpti>tjav"
    evtudit+V+TV+Der1+Der/alla+V+Imprt+Du2:             "evtud»alle>"
    hg+N+Sem/Measr+ABBR:                                "hg"
    DVD+v2+N+Sem/Obj-el+ACR+Sg+Nom:                     "dvd"
    jv+Adv+ABBR+Gram/IAbbr:                            ["jv", "jv."]
    ukeslij+Po:                                         "ukeslij>"
    ukeslij+Po:                                         "ukeslij>"
    jerrat+A+Attr+CmpN/SgG+Der5+Der/vuota+N+Ess:        "jierris>#»vuohta>n"
    nasjåvnålasj+A+CmpNP/Last+Sg+Nom:                   "nasjåvnålasj>"
    tæksta-tv+Area/NO+N+Sem/Org_Prod-vis+ACR+Sg+Ela:    "tæksta-tv>:as"
    tæksta-tv+Area/SE+N+Sem/Org_Prod-vis+ACR+Sg+Ela:    "täksta-tv>:as"
